apertium-oci.oci.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!-- 18/XII/2006          11.506 entrades           95% de cobertura-->
<dictionary>  
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀl</alphabet>  
  <sdefs>    
    <sdef n="detnt"    c="Determiner (neuter)"/>    
    <sdef n="percent"  c="Percent sign"/>    
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal (pronoun)"/>    
    <sdef n="predet"   c="Predeterminer (todo)"/>    
    <sdef n="atn"      c="Atonic"/>    
    <sdef n="enc"      c="Enclitic"/>    
    <sdef n="pro"      c="Proclitic"/>    
    <sdef n="tn"       c="Tonic (stressed)"/>    
    <sdef n="acr"      c="Acronym"/>    
    <sdef n="loc"      c="Location (toponym)"/>    
    <sdef n="top"      c="Toponym"/>    
    <sdef n="ant"      c="Anthroponym"/>    
    <sdef n="al"       c="Other"/>    
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun"/>    
    <sdef n="np"       c="Nom propi"/>    
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective"/>    
    <sdef n="f"        c="Feminine"/>    
    <sdef n="m"        c="Masculine"/>    
    <sdef n="mf"       c="Masculine/feminine"/>    
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>    
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>    
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb"/>    
    <sdef n="enon"     c="Enonciatif"/>    
    <sdef n="preadv"   c="Preadverb (muy)"/>    
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition"/>    
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>    
    <sdef n="rel"      c="Relative pronoun"/>    
    <sdef n="nn"       c="Inanimate"/>    
    <sdef n="an"       c="Animate/inanimate"/>    
    <sdef n="aa"       c="Animate"/>    
    <sdef n="ind"      c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogative"/>    
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determiner"/>    
    <sdef n="dem"      c="Demonstrative"/>    
    <sdef n="def"      c="Definite"/>    
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Coordinating conjunction"/>    
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/>    
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/>    
    <sdef n="nt"       c="Neuter"/>    
    <sdef n="vaux"     c="Auxiliary"/>    
    <sdef n="vbser"    c="Verb 'ser'"/>    
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="Verb 'haver'"/>    
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Lexical verb"/>    
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Modal verb"/>    
    <sdef n="inf"      c="Infinitive"/>    
    <sdef n="ger"      c="Gerund"/>    
    <sdef n="pp"       c="Past participle"/>    
    <sdef n="pri"      c="Present indicative"/>    
    <sdef n="ifi"      c="Pretérito indefinido"/>    
    <sdef n="p1"       c="First person"/>    
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Second person"/>    
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Third person"/>    
    <sdef n="pii"      c="Imperfecto indicativo"/>    
    <sdef n="fti"      c="Futuro indicativo"/>    
    <sdef n="cni"      c="Condicional"/>    
    <sdef n="prs"      c="Presente subjuntivo"/>    
    <sdef n="pis"      c="Imperfecto subjuntivo"/>    
    <sdef n="imp"      c="Imperativo"/>    
    <sdef n="pos"      c="Posesivo"/>    
    <sdef n="sp"       c="Singular/plural"/>    
    <sdef n="ref"      c="Reflexivo"/>    
    <sdef n="sup"      c="Superlativo"/>    
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>    
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjecció"/>    
    <sdef n="sent"     c="Punctuación de fin de oración"/>    
    <sdef n="cm"       c="Coma"/>    
    <sdef n="lpar"     c="Parentesis (esquerra)"/>    
    <sdef n="rpar"     c="Parentesis (dreta)"/>    
</sdefs>  
  <pardefs>    
        <pardef n="numeros">    
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>     
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="separa">    
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="coma">    
      <e><re>,</re><p><l/><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="paresq">    
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="pardret">    
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="emails">      
      <e><re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>   
    </pardef>
   
        <pardef n="urls">     
      <e><re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
<!-- ENCLÍTICS -->
        <pardef n="S__cantant-ne">                
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="S__cantant-lo">                
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r>i<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>'n</l><r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="S__cantant-les">                
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r>i<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>-en</l><r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="S__cantant-te">        
      <e><p><l>'m</l><r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>-mos</l><r>mos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>-mos</l><r>mos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>-nos</l><r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r>i<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>'s</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>'s</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>-las</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>'s</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>'s</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>-los</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>-la</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>-lo</l><r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>'n</l><r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l><r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>-li</l><r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="emails"/></e>
      <e><par n="urls"/></e>
